Utah statutes.
4-24-12.   Livestock -- Verification of ownership through brand inspection
-- Issuance of certificate of brand inspection -- Brand inspector may demand
evidence of ownership-- Brand inspection of livestock seized by the federal
government prohibited -- Exception.
(1)  A brand inspector, as an agent of the department, shall verify livestock
ownership by conducting a brand inspection during daylight hours.
(2)  After conducting the brand inspection, the brand inspector, if satisfied
that the livestock subject to inspection bears registered brands or marks
owned by the owner of the livestock, shall issue a brand inspection
certificate to the owner or owner's agent.
(3)  The brand inspector shall record the number, sex, breed, and brand or
mark on each animal inspected together with the owner's name.
(4)  If any livestock subject to inspection bears a brand or mark other than
that of the owner or, if no brand or mark appears on such livestock, the brand
inspector may demand evidence of ownership such as a bill of sale or other
evidence of ownership before issuing a brand inspection certificate.
(5)  A brand inspector shall not issue a brand inspection certificate for any
privately owned livestock seized by the federal government unless:
(a)  the brand inspector receives consent from the livestock's owner;
(b)  the owner is unknown; or
(c)  the brand inspector receives a copy of a court order authorizing the
seizure.
